Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2798.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; university of Arizona; map; report A. The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the university of Arizona for distribution to the Arizona geological survey established by section 27-102, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The monies appropriated by subsection A of this section shall be used to: 1. Compile available data on proven and probable reserves and notable occurrences in this state of all non-uranium fuel materials, including thorium, that are needed for generation III+ and generation IV advanced nuclear reactors, including molten salt reactors, liquid metal reactors and high-temperature gas-cooled reactors. 2. Create a statewide map of all proven and probable reserves and notable occurrences of the materials identified in paragraph 1 of this subsection. The map shall include the mineral and metal quantities and grades, if known, for each identified proven and probable reserve.  The map shall also include known mineral districts with significant potential for the materials identified in paragraph 1 of this subsection. C. On or before one year after the effective date of this section, the Arizona geological survey shall submit a report of the findings of the study conducted pursuant to subsection B of this section to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairperson of the natural resources, energy and water committee of the house of representatives and the chairperson of the natural resources committee of the senate and shall make available a copy of this report on the Arizona geological survey's website.